Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 17 Support of Homeless

40-17-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that there exists in this state undetermined numbers of homeless persons, many of whom suffer from chronic mental illness and disability, and that this condition exists among families and among individuals of all age groups without regard to ethnic or racial heritage or sex. The existence of this condition is declared to be detrimental to the health, safety, and welfare of the homeless individuals themselves and to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 359, § 1.

40-17-2.
Agency established.

There is hereby created a permanent council to be called the “interagency council on homelessness” consisting of eighteen (18) members and two (2) ex-officio members:

One of whom shall be the chief of the office of housing and community development, or his or her designee, who shall chair the interagency council on homelessness;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of administration, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the chair of the housing resources commission, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of human services, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of children, youth and families, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the office of healthy aging, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be director of the department of labor and training, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the emergency management agency, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be a representative from the Rhode Island office of veterans services, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the public defender, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the Medicaid director within the department of human services, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of health and human services, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the lieutenant governor, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be an ex-officio member who shall be from the Providence Veterans Administration Medical Center who specializes in health care for homeless veterans; and

One of whom shall be an ex-officio member who shall be the chair, or his or her designee, of the interagency council on homelessness advisory council as described in this chapter herein.

Forthwith upon the effective date of this chapter, the members of the commission shall meet at the call of the chair and organize. Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.

The department of administration is hereby directed to provide suitable quarters and staff for the commission.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish advice and information, documentary, and otherwise to the commission and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 216, § 1.

40-17-3.
Duties and responsibilities of council.

The duties and responsibilities of the council shall be:

To participate in the process of developing a strategic plan to end homelessness aligned with the federal strategic plan to end homelessness that will serve to reduce the number of homeless individuals and families in Rhode Island;

To coordinate services for the homeless among state agencies and instrumentalities, community-based organizations, faith-based organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy groups, and businesses;

To coordinate services not specifically for the homeless, but from which the homeless may benefit, among state agencies and instrumentalities, community-based organizations, faith-based organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy groups, and businesses; and

To identify and seek to remedy gaps in services, specifically in the area of making provisions for the availability, use, and permanent funding stream for permanent supportive housing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 359, § 1.

40-17-4.
Meeting and reporting requirements.

Meeting and reporting requirements are as follows:

The council shall meet regularly;

The council, in conjunction with the housing resources commission, shall provide the strategic plan and specific recommendations to prevent and end homelessness to the governor, senate president, speaker of the house, the senate committee on housing and municipal government, and the house corporations committee by February 1, 2012;

The council shall provide a report on funding available during calendar year 2011 for services, facilities, programs, or otherwise for people who are homeless. Said report shall be provided to the senate president, speaker of the house, senate fiscal advisor, and house fiscal advisor by January 31, 2012;

The council shall report annually to the governor and the general assembly, no later than March 2013, and annually thereafter, on the progress made in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in the strategic plan; on the current number of homeless individuals, families, and children; and any other pertinent information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 359, § 1.

40-17-5.
Advisory council established.

There is hereby created a permanent advisory council to the interagency council on homelessness containing representation of advocates; service providers; members of the veteran community, including housing providers and a current or former homeless veteran; current and/or former members of the homeless community; as well as representatives specifically affiliated with youth homelessness. All new members shall be chosen and approved by majority vote of the members present at an official meeting. At no time shall there be less than three (3) representatives of the homeless community, current or former. The chair shall be elected by a majority of the members.

The purpose of the council is to inform the interagency council on homelessness on the current status and issues facing the homeless throughout Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 87; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 25; P.L. 2011, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 216, § 1.